Tennessee, session 114, HB0121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-6-133(a), is amended by deleting
the language "governor" and substituting instead the language "commissioner of safety".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-6-133(b), is amended by deleting
the language "governor" wherever it appears and substituting instead the language
"commissioner".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0121
000185
- 1 -